Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board

§ 47-5-1201.
Legislative intent and purpose.

The purpose of this legislation is to alleviate the immediate and the projected operating capacity needs of the state correctional system by providing for the immediate and long-term addition of correctional facilities. It is the intent of the Legislature that agencies expedite the procurement of facilities to alleviate the short-term emergency capacity needs of the correctional system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved August 23, 1994).

§ 47-5-1203.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., ch. 26, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

[Laws, 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., ch. 26, § 2]

§ 47-5-1205.
Board to provide for construction and equipping of additional housing and support facilities.

The State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board shall provide for the construction and shall equip additional housing and necessary support facilities for one thousand two hundred sixteen (1,216) medium security male offenders and for two hundred (200) male offenders sentenced to evidence-based programs for the benefit of inmates at the South Mississippi Correctional Institution. The department may house offenders not sentenced to such programs in the two hundred (200) beds reserved for the program as it deems appropriate.

The State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board shall provide for the construction and shall equip additional housing and support facilities for seven hundred (700) medium security male offenders at the Central Mississippi Correctional Facility.

The State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board shall use funds from the “Corrections Facilities Emergency Construction Fund.”

The Department of Finance and Administration shall use its emergency powers to expedite the construction of these facilities. In the planning, design, procurement and construction of these facilities, the board shall make maximum utilization of plans, specifications and processes used in, completed or on-going construction projects for the Mississippi Department of Corrections.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 474, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 463, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 47-5-1207.
Board to select suitable sites for various public and private facilities.

The State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board shall select a suitable site or sites for a public or private facility not to exceed one thousand (1,000) beds in any of the following counties: Lauderdale, Quitman, Perry and Sharkey.

The State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board may contract for the construction, lease, acquisition, improvement, operation and management of a private correctional facility in Marshall County or Wilkinson County for the private incarceration of not more than one thousand (1,000) state inmates at the facility.

The State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board may contract with any county industrial or economic development authority or district for the construction, lease, acquisition, improvement, operation and management of a private correctional facility to be sited or constructed under Chapter 26, Laws of 1994 First Extraordinary Session.

The State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board may contract for the construction, lease, acquisition, improvement and operation of two (2) private restitution centers, one of which may be in Bolivar County. The capacity of each restitution center shall not exceed seventy-five (75) state inmates.

The State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board may contract for the special needs facility and services authorized in Sections 47-5-1101 through 47-5-1123.

No later than September 15, 1994, the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review shall determine the state medical cost per inmate day to use as a basis for measuring the validity of ten percent (10%) savings of the contractor cost.

Each private contractor and private facility housing state inmates must meet the requirements of Section 47-5-1211 through Section 47-5-1227.

No additional emergency prisons shall be located in any city and/or county, except upon the submission to the State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board, of a resolution signed by a majority of the governing authorities of the city and/or county, wherein the proposed prison site is to be located, approving and/or requesting that a prison facility be located at the proposed site.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved August 23, 1994).

§ 47-5-1209.
Noxubee County Prison Work Program.

There is created the Noxubee County Prison Work Program, to be located at the Industrial Park in Macon, Mississippi. The Noxubee County Prison Work Program shall be established pursuant to the authority granted in Sections 47-5-451 through 47-5-469 that provide for the joint state-county work programs, in order to achieve the legislative intent as set out in Section 47-5-351, making maximum utilization of the farmlands for the purpose of feeding offenders.

The State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board, subject to such funding as the Legislature may make available, may modify any existing facility or construct and equip one (1) seventy-five-bed correctional work camp in accordance with Section 47-5-455, on the site of the Industrial Park in Macon, Mississippi. The purpose of constructing this work camp is to provide housing and necessary support in order that the offenders may be available to work for the municipalities and counties in the surrounding areas in addition to working at the Industrial Park.

In the construction and renovation of a work camp, the State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board, in conjunction with the Mississippi Department of Corrections, shall utilize offenders in the custody of the Department of Corrections for construction to the extent such labor is available. The Mississippi Department of Corrections shall: establish, maintain and implement a program for training and utilizing offenders in construction projects; determine and provide to the State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board the name, the number and construction skills of offenders; and provide security officers to be in attendance during all hours when offenders are involved in construction. When necessary construction skills are not available from the offender population, the State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board may contract with private contractors or mechanics to perform necessary construction work.

In the planning, design, procurement and construction of a work camp, the State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board shall make maximum utilization of plans and specifications prepared for, and processes employed in, completed or ongoing construction projects for the Mississippi Department of Corrections.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved August 23, 1994).

§ 47-5-1211.
Contracts for private correctional facilities or services; experience of contractor; rates and benefits standards.

A contract for private correctional facilities or services shall not be entered into unless the contractor has demonstrated that it has:

The qualifications, experience and management personnel necessary to carry out the terms of the contract.

The ability to expedite the siting, design and construction of correctional facilities.

The ability to comply with applicable laws, court orders and national correctional standards.

Demonstrated history of successful operation and management of other correctional facilities.

A facility shall at all times comply with all federal and state laws, and all applicable court orders.

No contract for private incarceration shall be entered into unless the cost of the private operation, including the state’s cost for monitoring the private operation, offers a cost savings of at least ten percent (10%) to the Department of Corrections for at least the same level and quality of service offered by the Department of Corrections.

Beginning in 2012, and every two (2) years thereafter, the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) shall contract with a certified public accounting firm to establish a state inmate cost per day using financial information of the Department of Corrections for the most recently completed fiscal year. The state inmate cost per day shall be certified as required by this section. The certified cost shall be used as the basis for measuring the validity of the ten percent (10%) savings of the contractor costs.

Prior to engaging a certified public accountant, the PEER Committee, in conjunction with the Department of Corrections, shall develop a current cost-based model that will serve as a basis for the report produced as authorized by this section.

The rates and benefits for correctional services shall be negotiated based upon American Correction Association standards, state law and court orders.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 7; Laws, 2012, ch. 399, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 47-5-1213.
Term limits on contracts for operation and construction of facilities; conveyance of facilities to state.

The initial contract for the operation of a facility or for incarceration of inmates therein shall be for a period of not more than five (5) years with an option to renew for an additional period of two (2) years. Contracts for construction, purchase, or lease of a facility shall not exceed a term of twenty (20) years. Such contracts shall provide that the contractor shall convey the facility to the state, at the option of the state, for a total consideration of One Dollar ($1.00). Any contract for housing shall be subject to annual appropriation by the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved August 23, 1994).

§ 47-5-1215.
Private “correctional officers” of contractors; use of force and firearms restricted; training.

A contractor’s employees serving as “correctional officers” shall be allowed to use force only while on the grounds of a facility, while transporting inmates, and while pursuing escapees from a facility.

Private correctional officers shall be authorized to use only such non-deadly force as the circumstances require in the following situations: to prevent the commission of a felony or misdemeanor, including escape; to defend oneself or others against physical assault; to prevent serious damage to property; to enforce institutional regulations and orders; and to prevent or quell a riot.

A contractor’s employees, while performing their officially assigned duties relating to the custody, control, transportation, recapture or arrest of any escaped offender assigned to a contract prison, shall be authorized to use force and firearms as necessary to pursue and recapture escapees.

Private correctional officers who have been appropriately certified as determined by the contracting agency and trained pursuant to the provisions of subsection (5) shall have the right to carry and use firearms and shall exercise such authority and may use deadly force to prevent an act that could result in death or serious bodily injury to oneself or to another person.

Private correctional officers shall be trained in the use of force and the use of firearms, in accordance with ACA Standards and shall be trained, at the private contractor’s expense, for at least the minimum number of hours that public personnel are currently trained.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 9; Laws, 1998, ch. 581, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§ 47-5-1217.
Employee training.

All employees of a facility operated pursuant to Sections 47-5-1201 through 47-5-1229 must receive, at a minimum, the same quality and quantity of training as that required by the state, for employees of public correctional and detention facilities. All training expenses shall be the responsibility of the contractor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved August 23, 1994).

§ 47-5-1219.
Prerequisites for contracting for correctional services; defense of suits or claims.

A contract for correctional services shall not be entered into unless the following requirements are met:

In addition to fire and casualty insurance, the contractor provides at least Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) of liability insurance, specifically including insurance for civil rights claims. The liability insurance shall be issued by an insurance company with a rating of at least an A- according to A.M. Best standards. In determining the adequacy of such insurance, the Department of Finance and Administration shall determine whether:

The insurance is adequate to protect the state from any and all actions by a third party against the contractor or the state as a result of the contract;

The insurance is adequate to protect the state against any and all claims arising as a result of any occurrence during the term of the contract;

The insurance is adequate to assure the contractor’s ability to fulfill its contract with the state in all respects, and to assure that the contractor is not limited in this ability because of financial liability which results from judgments; and

The insurance is adequate to satisfy such other requirements specified by the independent risk management/actuarial firm.

The sovereign immunity of the state shall not apply to the contractor. Neither the contractor nor the insurer of the contractor may plead the defense of sovereign immunity in any action arising out of the performance of the contract.

The contractor shall post a performance bond to assure the contractor’s faithful performance of the specifications and conditions of the contract. The bond is required throughout the term of the contract. The terms and conditions must be approved by the Department of Corrections and the Department of Finance and Administration and such approval is a condition precedent to the contract taking effect.

The contractor shall defend any suit or claim brought against the State of Mississippi arising out of any act or omission in the operation of a private facility, and shall hold the State of Mississippi harmless from such claim or suit. The contractor shall be solely responsible for the payment of any legal or other costs relative to any such claim or suit. The contractor shall reimburse the State of Mississippi for any costs that it may incur as a result of such claim or suit immediately upon being submitted a statement therefor by the Attorney General.

The duties and obligations of the contractor pursuant to this subsection shall include, but not be limited to, any claim or suit brought under any federal or state civil rights or prisoners rights statutes or pursuant to any such rights recognized by common law or case law, or federal or state constitutions.

Any suit brought or claim made arising out of any act or omission in the operation of a private facility shall be made or brought against the contractor and not the State of Mississippi.

The Attorney General retains all rights and emoluments of his office which include direction and control over any litigation or claim involving the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved August 23, 1994).

§ 47-5-1221.
Plan for resumption of state control of facility upon termination of contract.

A plan shall be developed and certified by the commissioner which demonstrates the method by which the state would resume control of the prison upon contract termination. Such plan shall be submitted for review and comment to law enforcement agencies, the district attorney and circuit judges in the county in which the prison is located.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved August 23, 1994).

§ 47-5-1223.
Contract compliance officer; reimbursement of contract compliance officer’s salary and expenses by private entity.

The Commissioner of the Department of Corrections shall designate an existing employee of the Department of Corrections as a contract compliance officer within the department which shall monitor any contracts between the state and private entities for the operation and management of correctional facilities, and shall assure contractor compliance with its performance work statement and assure the provision of prisoner care requirements.

The contract compliance officer shall be responsible for monitoring all aspects of each privatized correctional facility.The officer shall be provided an on-site work area, shall be on-site on a daily basis, and shall have access to all areas of the facilities and to offenders and staff at all times.The private contractor or contractors shall provide any and all data, reports and other materials that the contract compliance officer determines are necessary to carry out monitoring responsibilities under this section.

The contract compliance officer shall report at least annually, or as requested, to the Governor, the Senate Committee on Corrections, the House Penitentiary Committee and the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review on the performance of the private contractor or contractors.

The salary and expenses of the contract compliance officer shall be reimbursed to the Department of Corrections by the private entity that has contracted to operate or manage a correctional facility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 13; Laws, 2010, ch. 403, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 47-5-1225.
Nondelegable responsibilities.

No contract for private correctional facilities or services shall authorize, allow, or imply a delegation of the authority or responsibility of the state to a prison contractor to:

Classify inmates or place inmates in less restrictive custody or more restrictive custody;

Transfer an inmate, although the contractor may recommend in writing that the department transfer a particular inmate;

Grant, deny, or revoke sentence credits;

Recommend that the parole board either deny or grant parole, although the contractor may submit written reports that have been prepared in the ordinary course of business;

Develop and implement procedures for calculating sentence credits or inmate release and parole eligibility dates;

Require an inmate to work, except on department-approved projects; approve the type of work that inmates may perform; or award or withhold wages or sentence credits based on the manner in which individual inmates perform such work; or

Determine inmate eligibility for furlough and work release.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved August 23, 1994).

§ 47-5-1227.
Restrictions on employment of public officials and employees by private entities.

No public official or an employee of a state agency who has duties or responsibilities related to the contracting, constructing, leasing, acquiring or operating a private correctional facility may become an employee, consultant or contract vendor to a private entity providing such facility or services to the state within one (1) year after the termination of his service or employment.

Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punished by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) but not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved August 23, 1994).

§ 47-5-1229.
Correctional Facilities Emergency Construction Fund.

There is hereby created a special fund to be designated as the “Correctional Facilities Emergency Construction Fund.” Any monies as may be appropriated by the Legislature shall be deposited into the fund. The expenditure of monies out of the fund shall be under the direction of the State Prison Emergency Construction and Management Board as spread on its minutes and such funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved August 23, 1994).